Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
From the funds appropriated to the Department of Public Safety
in Enrolled House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th
Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of Seven Hundred Fifty Thousand
Dollars ($750,000.00) shall be used for the School Secure Program
transferred from the State Board of Education to the Department of
Public Safety.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

Passed the House of Representatives the 20th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2779 Page 2